Florida, session 2026, HB6517.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. The facts stated in the preamble to this act
are found and declared to be true.
Section 2. The City of St. Petersburg is directed to draw
a warrant in the sum of $2.3 million payable to Heriberto A.
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb6517 -00-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S

ENROLLED
HB 6517 2026 Legislature
Sanchez-Mayen as compensation for injuries and damages
sustained.
Section 3. The amount paid by the City of St. Petersburg
pursuant to s. 768.28, Florida Statutes, and the amount awarded
under this act are intended to provide the sole compensation for
all present and future claims arising out of the factual
situation described in this act which resulted in injuries and
damages to Heriberto A. Sanchez-Mayen. The total amount paid for
attorney fees relating to this claim may not exceed 25 percent
of the total amount awarded under this act.
Section 4. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb6517 -00-er